Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0283.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 357c. A person that steals or otherwise takes a dog without the consent of the owner is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not less than $500.00 or more than $1,500.00, or both. Enacting section 1. Section 8 of 1939 PA 309, MCL 287.308, is repealed.